Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 4
EARLY CHILDHOOD MENTAL
HEALTH CONSULTATION PROGRAM

26-6.5-401 to 26-6.5-407. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part repealed, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 870, § 135, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 4 was added in 2020. For amendments to this part 4 prior to its repeal in 2022, consult the 2021 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. This part 4 was relocated to part 7 of article 3 of title 26.5. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this part 4, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.